Utah statutes.
57-21-11.   Relief granted -- Civil penalties -- Enforcement of final order.
(1)  Under Sections 57-21-9 and 57-21-10, if the director, presiding officer,
commissioner, Appeals Board, or court finds reasonable cause to believe that a
discriminatory housing practice has occurred or is about to occur, the
director, presiding officer, commissioner, Appeals Board, or court may order,
as considered appropriate:
(a)  the respondent to cease any discriminatory housing practice;
(b)  actual damages, reasonable attorneys' fees and costs to the aggrieved
person; and
(c)  any permanent or temporary injunction, temporary restraining order, or
other appropriate order.
(2)  In addition to the relief granted to an aggrieved person under Subsection
(1), in order to vindicate the public interest, the director, presiding
officer, or court may also assess civil penalties against the respondent in an
amount not exceeding:
(a)  $10,000 if the respondent has not been adjudged to have committed any
prior discriminatory housing practice;
(b)  $25,000 if the respondent has been adjudged to have committed one other
discriminatory housing practice during the five-year period ending on the date
of the filing of the complaint; or
(c)  $50,000 if the respondent has been adjudged to have committed two or more
discriminatory housing practices during the seven-year period ending on the
date of the filing of this complaint.
(3)  The time periods in Subsections (2)(b) and (c) may be disregarded if the
acts constituting the discriminatory housing practice are committed by the
same natural person who has previously been adjudged to have committed a
discriminatory housing practice.
(4)  The division may file a petition in a district court of competent
jurisdiction for:
(a)  the enforcement of a final department order; and
(b)  for any appropriate temporary relief or restraining order necessary for
the enforcement of a final commission order.
